Utah statutes.
34-45-107.   Exemptions -- Limitations on chapter -- School premises --
Government entities -- Religious organizations -- Single family detached
residential units.
(1) (a)  School premises, as defined in Subsection 76-3-203.2(1), are exempt
from the provisions of this chapter.
(b)  Possession of a firearm on or about school premises is subject to the
provisions of Section 76-10-505.5.
(2)  Government entities, including a local authority or state entity, are
subject to the requirements of Title 53, Chapter 5a, Firearm Laws, but are
otherwise exempt from the provisions of this chapter.
(3)  Religious organizations, including religious organizations acting as an
employer, are exempt from, and are not subject to the provisions of this
chapter.
(4)  Owner-occupied single family detached residential units and tenant-
occupied single family detached residential units are exempt from the
provisions of this chapter.
(5)  A person who is subject to federal law that specifically forbids the
presence of a firearm from property designated for motor vehicle parking, or a
person who is subject to Section 550 of the United States Department of
Homeland Security Appropriations Act of 2007, Pub. L. No. 109-295 or
regulations enacted in accordance with that section, is exempt from Section
34-45-103 if:
(a)  providing alternative parking or a storage location under Subsection
34-45-103(2)(a) would pose an undue burden on the person; and
(b)  the person files a statement with the attorney general citing the federal
law that forbids the presence of a firearm and detailing the reasons why
providing alternative parking or a storage location poses an undue burden.
(6)  A person who is subject to Section 550 of the United States Department of
Homeland Security Appropriations Act of 2007, Pub. L. No. 109-295 or
regulations enacted in accordance with that section is exempt from this
chapter if:
(a)  the person has attempted to provide alternative parking or a storage
location in accordance with Subsection 34-45-103(2)(a);
(b)  the secretary of the federal Department of Homeland Security notifies the
person that the provision of alternative parking or a storage location causes
the person to be out of compliance with Section 550 of the United States
Department of Homeland Security Appropriations Act of 2007, Pub. L. No.
109-295 or regulations enacted in accordance with that section and the person
may be subject to punitive measures; and
(c)  the person files a detailed statement with the attorney general notifying
the attorney general of the facts under Subsections (6)(a) and (b).
